Nevada, session 83, AB480.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, liability may
be established for a discriminatory housing practice if:
(a) The practice was motivated by a discriminatory intent; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the practice
was not motivated by a discriminatory intent but the practice
actually or predictably results in a discriminatory effect on a
group of persons or creates, increases, reinforces or perpetuates
segregated housing patterns because of race, religious creed,
color, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression, ancestry, familial status or sex.
2. There is no liability for a discriminatory housing practice
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if, based on evidence
that is not hypothetical or speculative:
(a) The practice is necessary to achieve one or more
substantial, legitimate and nondiscriminatory interests of the
respondent; and
(b) The interests of the respondent described in paragraph (a)
could not be served by another practice that has a less
discriminatory effect.
3. For purposes of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the
complainant must establish that a challenged practice caused or
predictably will cause a discriminatory effect. If the complainant
meets such burden of proof, the respondent has the burden of
proving that the challenged practice is necessary to achieve one or
more substantial, legitimate and nondiscriminatory interests of the
respondent. If the respondent meets his or her burden of proof, the
complainant may still prevail upon proving that the substantial,
legitimate and nondiscriminatory interests supporting the
challenged practice could be served by another practice that has a
less discriminatory effect.
4. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) “Complainant” means a person by whom, or on whose
behalf:
(1) A complaint is filed with the Commission pursuant to
NRS 118.110; or
(2) An action is commenced pursuant to NRS 118.120.
(b) “Respondent” means a person against whom:
(1) A complaint is filed with the Commission pursuant to
NRS 118.110; or
(2) An action is commenced pursuant to NRS 118.120.
Sec. 2. NRS 118.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.010 The provisions of NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act may be cited as the Nevada Fair Housing
Law.
Sec. 3. NRS 118.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.030 As used in NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 118.040 to 118.093, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)